Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.696

Transfer students' credit—List of academic courses equivalent to one year of general education credit—One-year academic completion certificate—Arts and sciences degrees for students entering with junior status—Publication of recommended courses by academic major for transfer students.

(1) A graduate of a community or technical college in this state who has earned a transferable associate of arts or sciences degree when admitted to a four-year institution of higher education shall have junior standing. A graduate who has earned the direct transfer associate of arts degree will be deemed to have met the lower division general education requirements of the receiving four-year institution of higher education. A graduate who has earned the associate of science transfer degree will be deemed to have met most requirements that prepare the graduate for baccalaureate degree majors in science, technology, engineering, and math and will be required to complete only such additional lower division, general education courses at the receiving four-year institutions of higher education as would have been required to complete the direct transfer associate of arts degree.

(2) A student who has earned the equivalent of ninety quarter credit hours and has completed the general education requirements at that four-year institution of higher education in Washington when admitted to another four-year institution of higher education shall have junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division general education requirements of the institution to which the student transfers.

(3) The community and technical colleges, jointly with the four-year institutions of higher education, must develop a list of academic courses that are equivalent to one-year's worth of general education credit and that would transfer for that purpose to any other two or four-year institution of higher education. If a student completes one-year's worth of general education credits, the student may be issued a one-year academic completion certificate. This certificate shall be accepted at any transferring two or four-year institution of higher education.

(4) Each institution of higher education must develop a minimum of one degree within the arts and sciences disciplines that can be completed within the equivalent of ninety quarter upper-division credits by any student who enters an institution of higher education with junior status and lower division general education requirements completed.

(5) Each four-year institution of higher education must publish a list of recommended courses for each academic major designed to help students who are planning to transfer design their course of study. Publication of the list of courses must be easily identified and accessible on the institution's website.

(6) The requirements to publish a list of recommended courses for each academic major under this section does not apply if an institution does not require courses or majors to meet specific requirements but generally applies credits earned towards degree requirements.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2011 1st sp.s. c 10: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.